sk-SK: Dekoračný materiál: Akryl; Hliník; Bambus; Mosadz; Bronzový; Plátno; Capiz; Kartón; Liatina; Keramický; Chróm; Betón; Meď; Korok; Bavlna; Krištáľ; Tkanina; Umelá kožušina; Umelá koža; Perie; Plsť; Sklo; Konope; Železo; Juta; Latex; Koža; Mramor; Drevovláknitá doska strednej hustoty (MDF); Melamín; Kov; Nylon; Papier; Papiermašé; Plast; Plyš; Polyester; Polypropylén (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Porcelán; Ratan; Živica; Guma; Satén; Flitre; Silikón; Hodváb; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Oceľ; Kameň; Semiš; Syntetický; Terracotta; Velúr; Zamat; Dyha; Vinyl; Vosk; Drevo; Vlna; Zinok; Iné
it: Materiale per la decorazione: Acrilico; Alluminio; Bamboo; Ottone; Bronzo; Tela; Capiz; Cartone; Ghisa; Ceramica; Cromo; Calcestruzzo; Rame; Sughero; Cotone; Cristallo; Tessuto; Pelliccia ecologica; Ecopelle; Piume; Feltro; Vetro; Canapa; Ferro; Iuta; Lattice; Pelle; Marmo; Pannello di fibra a media densità (MDF); Melammina; Metallo; Nylon; Carta; Papier-mâché; Plastica; Soffice; Poliestere; Polipropilene (PP); Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Porcellana; Rattan; Resina; Gomma; Satinato; Paillette; Silicone; Seta; Acciaio inossidabile; Acciaio; Pietra; Pelle scamosciata; Sintetico; Terracotta; Velour; Velluto; Impiallacciatura; Vinile; Cera; Legno; Lana; Zinco; Altro
nl: Decoratiemateriaal: Acryl; Aluminium; Bamboe; Messing; Brons; Canvas; Capiz; Karton; Gietijzer; Keramiek; Chroom; Beton; Koper; Kurk; Katoen; Kristal; Stof; Nepbont; Kunstleer; Veren; Vilt; Glas; Hennep; IJzer; Jute; Latex; Leer; Marmer; Medium density vezelplaat (MDF); Melamine; Metaal; Nylon; Papier; Papier-mâché; Plastic; Pluche; Polyester; Polypropyleen (PP); Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Porselein; Rotan; Hars; Rubber; Satijn; Lovertjes; Siliconen; Zijde; Roestvrij staal; Staal; Steen; Suède; Synthetisch; Terracotta; Velours; Fluweel; Fineer; Vinyl; Was; Hout; Wol; Zink; Andere
zh-CN: 装饰品材质: 丙烯酸; 铝; 竹子; 黄铜; 青铜色; 画布; 卡皮斯; 纸板; 铸铁; 陶瓷制品; 铬合金; 混凝土; 铜色; 软木; 棉布; 水晶玻璃; 面料/布料; 人造毛皮; 人造皮革; 羽毛; 毛毡; 玻璃; 麻; 铁; 黄麻; 乳胶; 皮革; 大理石; 中密度纤维板 (MDF); 三聚氰胺; 金属; 尼龙; 纸张; 混凝纸浆; 塑料; 柔软; 聚酯纤维; 聚丙烯 (PP); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 瓷器; 藤条; 树脂; 橡胶; 缎; 亮片; 硅胶; 丝绸; 不锈钢; 钢; 石头; 小牛皮; 合成; 陶瓦; 丝绒; 天鹅绒; 薄木板; 乙烯基贴纸; 蜡; 木头; 羊毛; 锌; 其他
bg-BG: Материал на декорацията: Акрил; Алуминий; Бамбук; Месинг; Бронз; Брезент; Капиз; Картон; Чугун; Керамика; Хром; Бетон; Мед; Корк; Памук; Кристал; Плат; Изкуствена козина; Изкуствена кожа; Пера; Филц; Стъкло; Коноп; Желязо; Юта; Латекс; Кожа; Мрамор; Фазер със средна плътност (MDF); Меламин; Метал; Найлон; Хартия; Papier-mâché; Пластмаса; Плюш; Полиестер; Полипропилен (PP); Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Порцелан; Ратан; Смола; Каучук; Сатен; Пайети; Силикон; Коприна; Неръждаема стомана; Стомана; Камък; Набук; Синтетичен; Теракота; Велур; Кадифе; Фурнир; Винил; Восък; Дърво; Вълна; Цинк; Други
fi: Sisustusmateriaali: Akryyli; Alumiini; Bambu; Messinki; Pronssi; Kanvaasi; Capiz-simpukka; Pahvi; Valurauta; Keraaminen; Kromi; Betoni; Kupari; Korkki; Puuvilla; Kristalli; Kangas; Tekoturkis; Keinonahka; Sulat; Huopa; Lasi; Hamppu; Rauta; Juutti; Lateksi; Nahka; Marmori; Puolikova kuitulevy (MDF); Melamiini; Metalli; Nailon; Paperi; Paperimassa; Muovi; Pehmo; Polyesteri; Polypropeeni (PP); Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Posliini; Rottinki; Hartsi; Kumi; Satiini; Paljetit; Silikoni; Silkki; Ruostumaton teräs; Teräs; Kivi; Mokka; Synteettinen; Terrakotta; Velour; Sametti; Veneer; Vinyyli; Vaha; Puu; Villa; Sinkki; Muu
hu: Dekorációs anyag: Akril; Alumínium; Bambusz; Sárgaréz; Bronz; Vászon; Capiz; Kartonpapír; Öntöttvas; Kerámia; Króm; Beton; Réz; Parafa; Pamutszövet; Kristály; Szövet; Műszőrme; Műbőr; Toll; Filc; Üveg; Kender; Vas; Juta; Latex; Bőr; Márvány; Közepes sűrűségű farostlemez (MDF); Melamin; Fém; Nejlon; Papír; Papírmasé; Műanyag; Plüss; Poliészter; Polipropilén (PP); Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Porcelán; Rattan; Gyanta; Gumi; Szatén; Flitter; Szilikon; Selyem; Rozsdamentes acél; Acél; Kő; Szarvasbőr; Szintetikus; Égetett agyag; Velúr; Bársony; Furnér; Vinil; Wax; Fa; Gyapjú; Cink; Egyéb
hr-HR: Materijal ukrasa: Akril; Aluminij; Bambus; Mjed; Bronca; Platno; Sedef; Karton; Lijevano željezo; Keramika; Krom; Beton; Bakar; Pluto; Pamuk; Kristal; Tkanina; Umjetno krzno; Umjetna koža; Perje; Filc; Staklo; Konoplja; Željezo; Juta; Lateks; Koža; Mramor; Vlaknasta ploča srednje gustoće (MDF); Melamin; Metal; Najlon; Papir; Kaširanje; Plastika; Pliš; Poliester; Polipropilen (PP); Polivinil klorid (PVC); Porculan; Ratan; Smola; Guma; Saten; Šljokice; Silikon; Svila; Nehrđajući čelik; Čelik; Kamen; Antilop; Sintetika; Terakota; Velur; Baršun; Furnir; Vinil; Vosak; Drvo; Vuna; Cink; Ostalo
ko: 장식 재료: 아크릴; 알루미늄; 대나무; 황동; 청동색; 캔버스; 카피스; 판지; 주철; 세라믹; 크로뮴; 콘크리트; 구리; 코르크; 면; 결정; 패브릭; 인조 모피; 인조 가죽; 깃털; 펠트; 유리; 대마; 철; 주트; 라텍스; 가죽; 대리석; 중밀도 섬유 보드(HDF); 멜라민; 금속; 나일론; 종이; Papier-mâché; 플라스틱; 푹신함; 폴리에스테르; 폴리프로필렌(PP); 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 도기; 등나무; 수지; 고무; 새틴; 스팽글; 실리콘; 실크; 스테인리스 스틸; 강철; 석재; 스웨이드; 인조; 테라코타; 벨루어; 벨벳; 베니어; 비닐; 왁스; 목재; 울; 아연; 기타
pt-BR: Material de decoração: Acrílico; Alumínio; Bambu; Latão; Bronze; Tela; Capiz; Cartão; Ferro fundido; Cerâmica; Cromado; Concreto; Cobre; Cortiça; Algodão; Cristal; Tecido; Pele sintetica; Couro falso; Penas; Sentido; Vidro; Cânhamo; Ferro; Juta; Látex; Couro; Mármore; Painel de fibra de média densidade (MDF); Melamina; Metal; Nylon; Papel; Papier-mâché; Plástico; Pelúcia; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Porcelana; Rattan; Resina; Borracha; Cetim; Lantejoulas; Silicone; Seda; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Pedra; Camurça; Sintético; Terracota; Veludo; Veludo; Folheado; Vinil; Cera; Madeira; Lã; Zinco; Outro
fr: Matériau de décoration: Acrylique; Aluminum; Bambou; Laiton; Bronze; Toiles; Capiz; Papier carton; Fonte; Céramique; Chrome; Béton; Cuivre; Liège; Coton; Cristal; Tissu; Fausse fourrure; Faux cuir; Plumes; Feutre; Verre; Chanvre; Fer; Jute; Latex; Cuir; Marbre; Panneaux de fibres de densité moyenne (MDF); Mélamine; Métal; Nylon; Papier; Papier-mâché; Plastique; Rembourré; Polyester; Polypropylène (PP); Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Porcelaine; Rattan; Résine; Caoutchouc; Satiné; Sequins; Silicone; Soie; Acier inoxydable; Acier; Pierre; Suède; Synthétique; Terracotta; Velours; Velours; Vernis; Vinyl; Cire; Bois; Laine; Zinc; Autre
ro-RO: Material decorațiune: Acrilic; Aluminiu; Bambus; Alamă; Bronz; Pânză; Capiz; Carton; Fontă; Ceramică; Crom; Beton; Cupru; Plută; Bumbac; Cristal; Textil; Blană artificială; Imitație de piele; Pene; Pâslă; Sticlă; Cânepă; Fier; Iută; Latex; Piele; Marmură; Plăci din fibre cu densitate medie (MDF); Melamină; Metal; Nailon; Hârtie; Papier-mâché; Plastic; Pluș; Poliester; Polipropilenă (PP); Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Porțelan; Ratan; Rășină; Cauciuc; Satin; Paiete; Silicon; Mătase; Oțel inoxidabil; Oțel; Piatră; Piele întoarsă; Sintetic; Teracotă; Velour; Catifea; Furnir; Vinil; Ceară; Lemn; Lână; Zinc; Altele
vi: Vật liệu trang trí: Acrylic; Nhôm; Tre; Đồng; Màu đồng; Toan; Điệp giấy; Bìa cứng; Chảo gang; Gốm; Chrome; Bê tông; Màu đồng đỏ; Thảm gỗ bần; Vải bông; Pha lê; Vải; Lông thú giả; Da giả; Lông vũ; Nỉ; Thủy tinh; Cây gai dầu; Sắt; Sợi đay; Mủ cao su; Da; Cẩm thạch; Ván sợi mật độ trung bình (MDF); Melamine; Kim loại; Nylon; Giấy; Papier-mâché; Nhựa; Lông nhung; Polyester; Polypropylene (PP); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Sứ; Cây mây; Nhựa resin; Cao su; Satin; Kim sa; Silicon; Lụa; Thép không gỉ; Thép; Đá; Da lộn; Tổng hợp; Đất nung; Vải velour; Nhung; Lớp gỗ mặt; Nhựa vinyl; Sáp; Gỗ; Len; Kẽm; Khác
pl: Materiał dekoracyjny: Akryl; Aluminium; Bambus; Mosiądz; Brąz; Płótno; Capiz; Tektura; Żeliwo; Ceramika; Chrome; Beton; Miedź; Korek; Bawełna; Kryształ; Tkanina; Sztuczne futro; Skaj; Pióra; Filc; Szkło; Konopie; Żelazo; Juta; Lateks; Skórzane; Marmur; Płyta pilśniowa średniej gęstości (MDF); Melamina; Metal; Nylon; Papier; Papier-mâché; Tworzywo sztuczne; Plusz; Poliester; Polipropylen (PP); Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Porcelana; Rattan; Żywica; Guma; Satyna; Cekiny; Silikon; Jedwab; Stal nierdzewna; Stal; Kamień; Zamsz; Syntetyczne; Terakota; Welur; Aksamit; Fornir; Winyl; Wosk; Drewno; Wełna; Cynk; Pozostałe
th: วัสดุตกแต่ง: อะคริลิก; อะลูมิเนียม; ไผ่; ทองเหลือง; สีบรอนซ์; ผ้าใบ; คาปิซ; กระดาษลัง; เหล็กหล่อ; เซรามิก; สไตล์โครม; คอนกรีต; สีทองแดง; ต้นคอร์ก; สำลี; คริสตัล; ผ้า; ขนเทียม; หนังเทียม; ขนนก; ผ้าสักหลาด; แก้ว; กัญชง; เหล็ก; ใยปอ; ยางพารา; หนัง; หินอ่อน; ไฟเบอร์บอร์ดความหนาแน่นปานกลาง (MDF); เมลามีน; โลหะ; ไนลอน; กระดาษ; เปเปอร์มาเช่; พลาสติก; ขนนุ่ม; โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลิโพรพิลีน (PP); โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); พอร์ซเลน; หวาย; เรซิน; ยาง; กระดาษเนื้อซาติน; กลิตเตอร์เลื่อม; ซิลิโคน; ผ้าไหม; เหล็กสเตนเลส; เหล็ก; หิน; หนังกลับ; สังเคราะห์; ดินเผา; ผ้ากำมะหยี่; ผ้ากำมะหยี่; วีเนียร์; ไวนิล; ขี้ผึ้ง; ไม้; ผ้าขนสัตว์; สังกะสี; อื่นๆ
es: Material de decoración: Acrílico; Aluminio; Bambú; Latón; Bronce; Lienzo; Capiz; Cartón; Hierro fundido; Cerámica; Cromo; Hormigón; Cobre; Corcho; Algodón; Cristal; Tejido; Piel sintética; Cuero sintético; Plumas; Fieltro; Vidrio; Cáñamo; Hierro; Yute; Látex; Cuero; Mármol; Tablero de fibra de densidad media (MDF); Melamina; Metal; Nylon; Papel; Papel maché; Plástico; Felpa; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Porcelana; Ratán; Resina; Goma; Satinado; Lentejuelas; Silicona; Seda; Acero inoxidable; Acero; Piedra; Gamuzado; Sintético; Terracotta; Terciopelo; Terciopelo; Chapa; Vinilo; Cera; Madera; Lana; Zinc; Otros
sv: Dekoration - material: Akryl; Aluminium; Bambu; Mässing; Brons; Kanvas; Capiz; Kartong; Gjutjärn; Keramisk; Krom; Betong; Koppar; Kork; Bomull; Kristall; Tyg; Fuskpäls; Fuskläder; Fjädrar; Filt; Glas; Hampa; Järn; Jute; Latex; Läder; Marmor; Mediumdensitetsfiberskiva (MDF); Melamin; Metall; Nylon; Papper; Papier-mâché; Plast; Plysch; Polyester; Polypropen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Porslin; Rattan; Harts; Gummi; Satin; Paljetter; Silikon; Silke; Rostfritt stål; Stål; Sten; Mocka; Syntetisk; Terrakotta; Velour; Sammet; Faner; Vinyl; Vax; Trä; Ylle; Zink; Annat
zh-TW: 裝飾設計材質: 壓克力; 鋁; 竹子; 黃銅; 銅色; 帆布; 卡皮茲; 紙板; 鑄鐵; 陶瓷; 鉻; 實心; 紅銅色; 軟木; 棉布; 水晶; 布料; 人造毛皮; 人造皮; 羽毛; 毛氈; 玻璃; 大麻; 鐵; 黃麻; 乳膠; 皮製; 大理石; 中密度纖維板; 三聚氰胺; 金屬; 尼龍; 紙; 混凝紙; 塑膠; 毛絨; 聚酯; 聚丙烯 (PP); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 陶瓷; 藤; 樹脂; 橡膠; 緞面布; 亮片; 矽膠; 絲綢; 不銹鋼; 鋼; 石頭; 麂皮; 合成; 紅陶; 絲絨; 天鵝絨; 單板; 乙烯基; 蠟; 木材; 羊毛; 鋅; 其他
da: Dekorationsmateriale: Akryl; Aluminum; Bambus; Messing; Bronze; Lærred; Capiz; Pap; Støbejern; Keramik; Krom; Beton; Kobber; Kork; Bomuld; Krystal; Stof; Kunstskind; Kunstigt læder; Fjer; Filt; Glas; Hamp; Jern; Jute; Latex; Læder; Marmor; Medium density-fiberplade (MDF); Melamin; Metal; Nylon; Papir; Papier-mâché; Plast; Plys; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Porcelæn; Rattan; Harpiks; Gummi; Satin; Pailletter; Silikone; Silke; Rustfrit stål; Stål; Sten; Ruskind; Syntetisk; Terracotta; Velour; Fløjl; Finer; Vinyl; Voks; Træ; Uld; Zink; Andet
ru: Материал украшения: Акрил; Алюминий; Бамбук; Латунь; Бронза; Холщовая ткань; Капиз; Картон; Чугун; Керамика; Хром; Бетон; Медь; Пробка; Хлопок; Хрусталь; Ткань; Искусственный мех; Искусственная кожа; Перья; Фетр; Стеклянные; Конопля; Железо; Джут; Латекс; Кожа; Мрамор; Древесноволокнистая плита средней плотности (МДФ); Меламин; Металл; Нейлон; Бумага; Папье-маше; Пластик; Плюш; Полиэстер; Полипропилен (ПП); Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Фарфор; Ротанг; Смола; Резина; Сатин; Пайетки; Силикон; Шелк; Нержавеющая сталь; Сталь; Камень; Замша; Синтетика; Терракота; Велюр; Бархат; Шпон; Винил; Воск; Дерево; Шерсть; Цинк; Другое
cs: Materiál dekorace: Akrylové; Hliník; Bambus; Mosaz; Bronzová; Plátno; Kapiz; Lepenka; Železná litina; Keramika; Chrom; Beton; Měděná; Korek; Bavlna; Krystal; Látky; Nepravá kožešina; Nepravá kůže; Peří; Plst; Sklo; Konopí; Železo; Juta; Latex; Kůže; Mramor; Dřevovláknitá deska se střední hustotou (HDF); Melamin; Kov; Nylon; Papír; Papier-mâché; Plast; Plyšový; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Porcelán; Ratan; Pryskyřice; Guma; Satén; Flitry; Silikon; Hedvábí; Nerezová ocel; Ocel; Kámen; Semiš; Syntetické; Terakota; Velur; Samet; Dýha; Vinylové; Vosk; Dřevo; Vlna; Zinek; Jiné
nb: Dekorasjonsmateriale: Akryl; Aluminium; Bambus; Messing; Bronse; Lerret; Capiz; Papp; Støpejern; Keramikk; Krom; Betong; Kobber; Kork; Bomull; Krystall; Stoff; Fuskepels; Kunstig lær; Fjær; Filt; Glass; Hamp; Jern; Jute; Lateks; Skinn; Marmor; Fiberplater med middels tetthet (MDF); Melamin; Metall; Nylon; Papir; Papier-mâché; Plast; Plysj; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Porselen; Rotting; Harpiks; Gummi; Sateng; Paljetter; Silikon; Silke; Rustfritt stål; Stål; Stein; Semsket; Syntetisk; Terracotta; Velour; Fløyel; Finér; Vinyl; Voks; Trevirke; Ull; Sink; Annen
de: Dekorationsmaterial: Acryl; Aluminium; Bambus; Messing; Bronze; Leinwand; Capiz; Karton; Gusseisen; Keramik; Chrom; Beton; Kupfer; Kork; Baumwolle; Kristall; Stoff; Kunstpelz; Kunstleder; Federn; Filz; Glas; Hanf; Eisen; Jute; Latex; Leder; Marmor; Mitteldichte Faserplatte (MDF); Melamin; Metall; Nylon; Papier; Papiermaché; Kunststoff; Plüsch; Polyester; Polypropylen (PP); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Porzellan; Rattan; Harz; Gummi; Seidenmatt; Pailletten; Silikon; Seide; Edelstahl; Stahl; Stein; Wildleder; Synthetisch; Terrakotta; Velours; Samt; Furnier; Vinyl; Wachs; Holz; Wolle; Zink; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Material de decoração: Acrílico; Alumínio; Bambu; Latão; Bronze; Tela; Capiz; Cartão; Ferro fundido; Cerâmica; Cromado; Betão; Cobre; Cortiça; Algodão; Cristal; Tecido; Peles sintéticas; Couro falso; Penas; Feltro; Vidro; Cânhamo; Ferro; Juta; Látex; Pele; Mármore; Painel de fibra de média densidade (MDF); Melamina; Metal; Náilon; Papel; Papier-mâché; Plástico; Peluche; Poliéster; Polipropileno (PP); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Porcelana; Ratim; Resina; Borracha; Acetinado; Lantejoulas; Silicone; Seda; Aço inoxidável; Aço; Pedra; Camurça; Sintético; Terracota; Aveludado; Veludo; Folheado; Vinil; Cera; Madeira; Lã; Zinco; Outro
tr: Dekorasyon malzemesi: Akrilik; Alüminyum; Bambu; Pirinç; Bronz; Tuval; Capiz; Kalın karton; Dökme demir; Seramik; Krom; Beton; Bakır; Mantar; Pamuk; Kristal; Kumaşlar; Sahte kürk; Suni deri; Tüyler; Keçe; Cam; Kenevir; Demir; Jüt; Lateks; Deri; Mermer; Orta yoğunluklu lif levha (MDF); Melamin; Metal; Plastik; Kağıt; Kartonpiyer; Plastik; Peluş; Poliyester; Polipropilen (PP); Polivinil klorür (PVC); Porselen; Hint kamışı; Reçine; Kauçuk; Saten; Payetler; Silikon; İpek; Paslanmaz çelik; Çelik; Taş; Süet; Sentetik; Pişmiş toprak; Velur; Kadife; Ahşap kaplama; Vinil; Balmumu; Ahşap; Yünlüler; Çinko; Diğer
el: Διακοσμητικό υλικό: Ακρυλικό; Αλουμίνιο; Μπαμπού; Ορείχαλκος; Ορείχαλκος; Καμβάς; Capiz; Χαρτόνι; Χυτοσίδηρος; Κεραμικό; Χρώμιο; Σκυρόδεμα; Χαλκός; Φελλός; Βαμβάκι; Κρύσταλλο; Ύφασμα; Συνθετική γούνα; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Φτερά; Τσόχα; Γυαλί; Καννάβι; Σίδερο; Γιούτα; Λάτεξ; Δέρμα; Μάρμαρο; Ινοσανίδα μεσαίας πυκνότητας (MDF); Μελαμίνη; Μέταλλο; Νάιλον; Χαρτί; Πεπιεσμένο χαρτί; Πλαστικό; Πλούσα; Πολυεστέρας; Πολυπροπυλένιο (PP); Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Πορσελάνη; Ρατάν; Ρητίνη; Καουτσούκ; Σατέν; Πούλιες; Σιλικόνη; Μετάξι; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Χάλυβας; Πέτρα; Καστόρι; Συνθετικό; Τερακότα; Βελουτέ; Βελούδο; Καπλαμάς; Βινύλιο; Κερί; Ξύλο; Μαλλί; Τσίγκος; Άλλο
en: Decoration material: Acrylic; Aluminum; Bamboo; Brass; Bronze; Canvas; Capiz; Cardboard; Cast iron; Ceramic; Chrome; Concrete; Copper; Cork; Cotton; Crystal; Fabric; Faux fur; Faux leather; Feathers; Felt; Glass; Hemp; Iron; Jute; Latex; Leather; Marble; Medium density fiberboard (MDF); Melamine; Metal; Nylon; Paper; Papier-mâché; Plastic; Plush; Polyester; Polypropylene (PP); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Porcelain; Rattan; Resin; Rubber; Satin; Sequins; Silicone; Silk; Stainless steel; Steel; Stone; Suede; Synthetic; Terracotta; Velour; Velvet; Veneer; Vinyl; Wax; Wood; Wool; Zinc; Other
ja: デコレーション材質: アクリル; アルミニウム; バンブー; 真鍮; ブロンズ; キャンバス; カピス; 段ボール; 鋳鉄; セラミック; クロム; コンクリート; コッパー; コルク; コットン; クリスタル; 布・生地; フェイクファー; フェイクレザー; フェザー; フェルト; ガラス; 麻; 鉄; ジュート; ラテックス; レザー; 大理石; 中密度繊維板 (MDF); メラミン; 金属; ナイロン; 紙; 張り子; プラスチック; プラッシュ; ポリエステル; ポリプロピレン (PP); ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); 磁器; 籐; レジン; ゴム; サテン; スパンコール; シリコーン; シルク; ステンレススチール; スチール; 石; スエード; 合成品; テラコッタ; ベロア; ベルベット; ベニヤ; ビニール; ワックス; 木材; ウール; 亜鉛; その他
lt-LT: Papuošalo medžiaga: Akrilas; Aliuminis; Bambukas; Žalvaris; Bronza; Drobė; „Capiz“ kriauklės; Kartonas; Ketus; Keramika; Chromas; Betonas; Varis; Kamštiena; Medvilnė; Krištolas; Audiniai; Dirbtinis kailis; Dirbtinė oda; Plunksnos; Veltinis; Stiklas; Kanapių pluoštas; „Iron“ (tiesių smūgių); Džiutas; Lateksas; Oda; Marmuras; Vidutinio tankio medienos plaušų plokštė (MDF); Melaminas; Metalas; Nailonas; Popierius; Papjė mašė; Plastikas; Pliušas; Poliesteris; Polipropilenas (PP); Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Porcelianas; Ratanas; Derva; Kaučiukas; Satinas; Blizgučiai; Silikonas; Šilkas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Plienas; Akmuo; Zomša; Sintetika; Terakota; Veliūras; Aksomas; Fanera; Vinilas; Vaškas; Mediena; Vilna; Cinkas; Kita
sl-SI: Material za dekoracijo: Akril; Aluminij; Bambus; Medenina; Bron; Platno; Capiz; Karton; Lito železo; Keramika; Krom; Beton; Baker; Pluta; Bombaž; Kristal; Tkanina; Umetno krzno; Umetno usnje; Perje; Filc; Steklo; Konoplja; Železo; Juta; Latex; Usnje; Marmor; Vlaknene plošče srednje gostote (MDF); Melamin; Kovina; Najlon; Papir; Papirmaše; Plastika; Pliš; Poliester; Polipropilen (PP); Polivinilklorid (PVC); Porcelan; Ratan; Smola; Guma; Saten; Ploščate bleščice; Silikon; Svila; Nerjavno jeklo; Jeklo; Kamen; Semiš; Sintetika; Terakota; Velur; Žamet; Furnir; Vinil; Vosek; Les; Volna; Cink; Drugo